Utah statutes.
76-10-2101.   Use of recycling bins -- Prohibited items -- Penalties.

(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Recycling" means the process of collecting materials diverted from the
waste stream for reuse.
(b)  "Recycling bin" means any receptacle made available to the public by a
governmental entity or private business for the collection of any source-
separated item for recycling purposes.
(2)  It is an infraction to place any prohibited item or substance in a
recycling bin if the bin is posted with the following information printed
legibly in basic English:
(a)  a descriptive list of the items that may be deposited in the recycling
bin, entitled in boldface capital letters: "ITEMS YOU MAY DEPOSIT IN THIS
RECYCLING BIN:";
(b)  at the end of the list in Subsection (a), the following statement in
boldface capital letters: "REMOVING FROM THIS BIN ANY ITEM THAT IS LISTED
ABOVE AND THAT YOU DID NOT PLACE IN THE CONTAINER IS THE CRIMINAL OFFENSE OF
THEFT, PUNISHABLE BY LAW.";
(c)  the following statement in boldface capital letters: "DEPOSIT OF ANY
OTHER ITEM IN THIS RECYCLING BIN IS AGAINST THE LAW.";
(d)  the following statement in boldface capital letters, posted on the
recycling collection container in close proximity to the notices required
under Subsections (2)(a), (b), and (c): "PLACING ANY ITEM OR SUBSTANCE IN THIS
RECYCLING BIN OTHER THAN THOSE ALLOWED IN THE LIST POSTED ON THIS BIN IS AN
INFRACTION, PUNISHABLE BY A MAXIMUM FINE OF $750."; and
(e)  the name and telephone number of the entity that owns the recycling bin
or is responsible for its placement and maintenance.
